North Dakota, session 69, HB1548.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES -
FITNESS CENTER - ONE-TIME FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the
strategic investment and improvements fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated,
the sum of $10,000,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the department of
health and human services for the purpose of providing a grant to an organization for the
construction of a fitness center that will benefit the residents of the life skills and transition
center, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The funding
provided in this section is considered a one-time funding item.
Page No. 1 25.1165.02000